testing/kom-num-test.yaml
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Car+PxPl2: нёльястӧгныд
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+PxPl2+Cns: нёльясныдла
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Comp+PxPl2: нёльяссяныд
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ine+PxPl2: нёльясаныд
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ela+PxPl2: нёльяссьыныд
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ill+PxPl2: нёльясаныд
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+PxPl2+Apr: нёльясныдлань
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Egr+PxPl2: нёльяссяньныд
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Prl+PxPl2: нёльясӧдныд
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Prl+Tra+PxPl2: нёльясӧдтіныд
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ter+PxPl2: нёльясӧдзныд
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+PxPl3+Nom: нёльясныс
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+PxPl3+Gen: нёльясныслӧн
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+PxPl3+Abl: нёльясныслысь
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+PxPl3+Dat: нёльясныслы
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+PxPl3+Acc: нёльяснысӧ
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Instr+PxPl3: нёльяснаныс
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+PxPl3+Com: нёльясныскӧд
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Car+PxPl3: нёльястӧгныс
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+PxPl3+Cns: нёльяснысла
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Comp+PxPl3: нёльяссяныс
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ine+PxPl3: нёльясаныс
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ela+PxPl3: нёльяссьыныс
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ill+PxPl3: нёльясаныс
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+PxPl3+Apr: нёльясныслань
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Apr+PxPl3: нёльясланьныс
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Egr+PxPl3: нёльяссяньныс
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Prl+PxPl3: нёльясӧдныс
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Prl+Tra+PxPl3: нёльясӧдтіныс
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ter+PxPl3: нёльясӧдзныс
     нёль+Num+Ord+Abs: нёльӧд
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Nom: нёльӧд
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Acc: [нёльӧд, нёльӧдӧс]
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Gen: нёльӧдлӧн
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Abl: нёльӧдлысь
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Dat: нёльӧдлы
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Instr: нёльӧдӧн
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Com: нёльӧдкӧд
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Car: нёльӧдтӧг
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Cns: нёльӧдла
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Comp: нёльӧдся
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ine: нёльӧдын
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ela: нёльӧдысь
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ill: нёльӧдӧ
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Apr: нёльӧдлань
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Egr: нёльӧдсянь
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Prl: нёльӧдӧд
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Prl+Tra: нёльӧдӧдті
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ter: нёльӧдӧдз
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Sg+PxSg1+Nom: нёльӧдӧй
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Sg+PxSg1+Gen: нёльӧдӧйлӧн
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Sg+PxSg1+Abl: нёльӧдӧйлысь
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Sg+PxSg1+Dat: нёльӧдӧйлы
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Sg+PxSg1+Acc: нёльӧдӧс
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Instr+PxSg1: нёльӧднам
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Sg+PxSg1+Com: нёльӧдӧйкӧд
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Sg+PxSg1+Car: нёльӧдӧйтӧг
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Sg+PxSg1+Cns: нёльӧдӧйла
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Sg+PxSg1+Comp: нёльӧдӧйся
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ine+PxSg1: нёльӧдам
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ela+PxSg1: нёльӧдсьым
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ill+PxSg1: нёльӧдам
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Sg+PxSg1+Apr: нёльӧдӧйлань
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Sg+PxSg1+Egr: нёльӧдӧйсянь
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Prl+PxSg1: нёльӧдӧдым
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Prl+Tra+PxSg1: нёльӧдӧдтіым
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ter+PxSg1: нёльӧдӧдзым
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Sg+PxSg2+Nom: нёльӧдыд
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Sg+PxSg2+Gen: нёльӧдыдлӧн
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Sg+PxSg2+Abl: нёльӧдыдлысь
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Sg+PxSg2+Dat: нёльӧдыдлы
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Sg+PxSg2+Acc: нёльӧдтӧ
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Instr+PxSg2: нёльӧднад
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Sg+PxSg2+Com: нёльӧдыдкӧд
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Car+PxSg2: нёльӧдтӧгыд
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Sg+PxSg2+Cns: нёльӧдыдла
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Comp+PxSg2: нёльӧдсяыд
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ine+PxSg2: нёльӧдад
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ela+PxSg2: нёльӧдсьыд
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ill+PxSg2: нёльӧдад
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Apr+PxSg2: нёльӧдланьыд
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Egr+PxSg2: нёльӧдсяньыд
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Prl+PxSg2: нёльӧдӧдыд
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Prl+Tra+PxSg2: нёльӧдӧдтіыд
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ter+PxSg2: нёльӧдӧдзыд
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Sg+PxSg3+Nom: нёльӧдыс
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Sg+PxSg3+Gen: нёльӧдыслӧн
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Sg+PxSg3+Abl: нёльӧдыслысь
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Sg+PxSg3+Dat: нёльӧдыслы
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Sg+PxSg3+Acc: нёльӧдсӧ
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Instr+PxSg3: нёльӧднас
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Sg+PxSg3+Com: нёльӧдыскӧд
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Car+PxSg3: нёльӧдтӧгыс
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Sg+PxSg3+Cns: нёльӧдысла
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Comp+PxSg3: нёльӧдсяыс
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ine+PxSg3: нёльӧдас
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ela+PxSg3: нёльӧдсьыс
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ill+PxSg3: нёльӧдас
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Apr+PxSg3: нёльӧдланьыс
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Egr+PxSg3: нёльӧдсяньыс
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Prl+PxSg3: нёльӧдӧдыс
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Prl+Tra+PxSg3: нёльӧдӧдтіыс
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ter+PxSg3: нёльӧдӧдзыс
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Sg+PxPl1+Nom: нёльӧдным
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Sg+PxPl1+Gen: нёльӧднымлӧн
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Sg+PxPl1+Abl: нёльӧднымлысь
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Sg+PxPl1+Dat: нёльӧднымлы
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Sg+PxPl1+Acc: нёльӧднымӧс
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Instr+PxPl1: нёльӧднаным
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Sg+PxPl1+Com: нёльӧднымкӧд
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Car+PxPl1: нёльӧдтӧгным
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Sg+PxPl1+Cns: нёльӧднымла
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Comp+PxPl1: нёльӧдсяным
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ine+PxPl1: нёльӧданым
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ela+PxPl1: нёльӧдсьыным
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ill+PxPl1: нёльӧданым
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Apr+PxPl1: нёльӧдланьным
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Egr+PxPl1: нёльӧдсяньным
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Prl+PxPl1: нёльӧдӧдным
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Prl+Tra+PxPl1: нёльӧдӧдтіным
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ter+PxPl1: нёльӧдӧдзным
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Sg+PxPl2+Nom: нёльӧдныд
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Sg+PxPl2+Gen: нёльӧдныдлӧн
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Sg+PxPl2+Abl: нёльӧдныдлысь
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Sg+PxPl2+Dat: нёльӧдныдлы
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Sg+PxPl2+Acc: нёльӧдныдтӧ
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Instr+PxPl2: нёльӧднаныд
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Sg+PxPl2+Com: нёльӧдныдкӧд
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Car+PxPl2: нёльӧдтӧгныд
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Sg+PxPl2+Cns: нёльӧдныдла
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Comp+PxPl2: нёльӧдсяныд
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ine+PxPl2: нёльӧданыд
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ela+PxPl2: нёльӧдсьыныд
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ill+PxPl2: нёльӧданыд
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Sg+PxPl2+Apr: нёльӧдныдлань
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Egr+PxPl2: нёльӧдсяньныд
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Prl+PxPl2: нёльӧдӧдныд
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Prl+Tra+PxPl2: нёльӧдӧдтіныд
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ter+PxPl2: нёльӧдӧдзныд
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Sg+PxPl3+Nom: нёльӧдныс
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Sg+PxPl3+Gen: нёльӧдныслӧн
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Sg+PxPl3+Abl: нёльӧдныслысь
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Sg+PxPl3+Dat: нёльӧдныслы
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Sg+PxPl3+Acc: нёльӧднысӧ
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Instr+PxPl3: нёльӧднаныс
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Sg+PxPl3+Com: нёльӧдныскӧд
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Car+PxPl3: нёльӧдтӧгныс
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Sg+PxPl3+Cns: нёльӧднысла
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Comp+PxPl3: нёльӧдсяныс
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ine+PxPl3: нёльӧданыс
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ela+PxPl3: нёльӧдсьыныс
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ill+PxPl3: нёльӧданыс
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Sg+PxPl3+Apr: нёльӧдныслань
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Apr+PxPl3: нёльӧдланьныс
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Egr+PxPl3: нёльӧдсяньныс
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Prl+PxPl3: нёльӧдӧдныс
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Prl+Tra+PxPl3: нёльӧдӧдтіныс
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ter+PxPl3: нёльӧдӧдзныс
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Nom: нёльӧдъяс
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Acc: нёльӧдъяс
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Acc: нёльӧдъясӧс
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Gen: нёльӧдъяслӧн
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Abl: нёльӧдъяслысь
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Dat: нёльӧдъяслы
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Instr: нёльӧдъясӧн
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Com: нёльӧдъяскӧд
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Car: нёльӧдъястӧг
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Cns: нёльӧдъясла
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Comp: нёльӧдъясся
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ine: нёльӧдъясын
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ela: нёльӧдъясысь
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ill: нёльӧдъясӧ
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Apr: нёльӧдъяслань
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Egr: нёльӧдъяссянь
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Prl: нёльӧдъясӧд
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Prl+Tra: нёльӧдъясӧдті
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ter: нёльӧдъясӧдз
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Pl+PxSg1+Nom: нёльӧдъясӧй
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Pl+PxSg1+Gen: нёльӧдъясӧйлӧн
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Pl+PxSg1+Abl: нёльӧдъясӧйлысь
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Pl+PxSg1+Dat: нёльӧдъясӧйлы
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Pl+PxSg1+Acc: нёльӧдъясӧс
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Instr+PxSg1: нёльӧдъяснам
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Pl+PxSg1+Com: нёльӧдъясӧйкӧд
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Pl+PxSg1+Car: нёльӧдъясӧйтӧг
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Pl+PxSg1+Cns: нёльӧдъясӧйла
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Pl+PxSg1+Comp: нёльӧдъясӧйся
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ine+PxSg1: нёльӧдъясам
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ela+PxSg1: нёльӧдъяссьым
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ill+PxSg1: нёльӧдъясам
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Pl+PxSg1+Apr: нёльӧдъясӧйлань
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Pl+PxSg1+Egr: нёльӧдъясӧйсянь
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Prl+PxSg1: нёльӧдъясӧдым
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Prl+Tra+PxSg1: нёльӧдъясӧдтіым
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ter+PxSg1: нёльӧдъясӧдзым
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Pl+PxSg2+Nom: нёльӧдъясыд
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Pl+PxSg2+Gen: нёльӧдъясыдлӧн
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Pl+PxSg2+Abl: нёльӧдъясыдлысь
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Pl+PxSg2+Dat: нёльӧдъясыдлы
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Pl+PxSg2+Acc: нёльӧдъястӧ
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Instr+PxSg2: нёльӧдъяснад
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Pl+PxSg2+Com: нёльӧдъясыдкӧд
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Car+PxSg2: нёльӧдъястӧгыд
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Pl+PxSg2+Cns: нёльӧдъясыдла
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Comp+PxSg2: нёльӧдъяссяыд
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ine+PxSg2: нёльӧдъясад
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ela+PxSg2: нёльӧдъяссьыд
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ill+PxSg2: нёльӧдъясад
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Apr+PxSg2: нёльӧдъясланьыд
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Egr+PxSg2: нёльӧдъяссяньыд
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Prl+PxSg2: нёльӧдъясӧдыд
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Prl+Tra+PxSg2: нёльӧдъясӧдтіыд
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ter+PxSg2: нёльӧдъясӧдзыд
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Pl+PxSg3+Nom: нёльӧдъясыс
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Pl+PxSg3+Gen: нёльӧдъясыслӧн
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Pl+PxSg3+Abl: нёльӧдъясыслысь
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Pl+PxSg3+Dat: нёльӧдъясыслы
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Pl+PxSg3+Acc: нёльӧдъяссӧ
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Instr+PxSg3: нёльӧдъяснас
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Pl+PxSg3+Com: нёльӧдъясыскӧд
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Car+PxSg3: нёльӧдъястӧгыс
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Pl+PxSg3+Cns: нёльӧдъясысла
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Comp+PxSg3: нёльӧдъяссяыс
